Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 2 Trade Names Registration

Revision of chapter. —

Laws 1977, ch. 162, revised this chapter. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1977 Act has been attempted, but where appropriate historical citations have been added to the revised sections.

Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 3, provides: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

74 Am. Jur. 2d Trademarks and Tradenames § 1 et seq.

Benevolent or fraternal society or organization as entitled to protection against use of same or similar name, insignia or ritual by another organization, 76 ALR2d 1396.

Right of charitable or religious association or corporation to protection against use of same or similar name by another, 37 ALR3d 277.

Incorporation of company under particular name as creating exclusive right to such name, 68 ALR3d 1168.

Protection of business or trading corporation against use of same or similar name by another corporation, 72 ALR3d 8.

Letters, initials, or numerals as common-law trademarks, 56 ALR Fed 232.

Application of functionality doctrine under § 43(a) of Lanham Act (15 USC § 1125(a)), 78 ALR Fed 712.

Application of secondary meaning test in action for trademark or tradename infringement under § 43(a) of the Lanham Act (15 USC § 1125(a)), 86 ALR Fed 489.

Parody as trademark or tradename infringement, 92 ALR Fed 25.

“Post-sale confusion” in trademark or trade dress infringement actions under § 43 of Lanham Trademark Act (15 U.S.C. § 1125), 145 ALR Fed 407.

Application of “De Minimis Non Curat Lex” to Copyright Infringement Claims”, 150 ALR Fed 661.

When is trade dress “inherently distinctive” for purposes of trade dress infringement actions under § 43(a) of Lanham Act (15 U.S.C. § 1125(a))—Cases after Two Pesos, 161 ALR Fed 327.

87 C.J.S. Trademarks, Tradenames and Unfair Competition § 1 et seq.

§ 40-2-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act unless the context otherwise requires:

“Applicant” means a person filing an application for registration or reservation of a trade name under this act, his legal representatives, successors or assigns;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, unincorporated association, two (2) or more of the foregoing having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Registrant” means a person to whom registration of a trade name under this act is issued, his legal representatives, successors or assigns;

“Trade name” means a word, name, or any combination of the foregoing in any form or arrangement used by a person to identify his business, vocation, or occupation and distinguish it from the business, vocation or occupation of others;

“This act” means W.S.

40-2-101

through

40-2-111

.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 230, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.15; Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

substituted "40-2-111" for "40-2-109" in (a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Trademark not made part of transaction through reference to “trade name” in contract. —

Since “trade name” and “trademark” are legal terms of art and different legal connotations attach to them, the reference to “the trade name of ‘My Hero’ and ‘My Hero Sandwich Shop’” in sale contract documents did not manifest any intention to make a trademark a part of the parties' transactions. Dawson v. Lohn, 705 P.2d 853,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 561

(Wyo. 1985).

§ 40-2-102.
Registrability.

A trade name shall not be registered if it:

Is the same as, or deceptively similar to, a trademark or service mark registered in this state, or is not distinguishable from the names of other business entities as required by W.S.

17-16-401

;

Contains any word or phrase which indicates that it is engaged in the business of banking or insurance, except as provided in subsections (b) through (d) of this section.

National banking associations previously approved by the comptroller of the currency, whose principal place of business is located within the state of Wyoming and who are actively engaged in the business of banking on the effective date of this act may be registered with the Wyoming secretary of state and entitled to all of the protection of other registered trade names.

Any person desiring to register a bank trade name for any proposed national banking association shall comply with the provisions of this act. The secretary of state shall conditionally approve the proposed trade name if not the same as or deceptively similar to any trade name registered under this act, a trademark or service mark registered in this state or the name of a corporation incorporated or authorized to do business in this state, or which is exclusively reserved under W.S.

17-16-402

. Conditional approval shall expire in twelve (12) months unless extended for good cause for an additional period of six (6) months. Conditional approval shall not become final and the name registered until the applicant has received approval to engage in the business of banking by the comptroller of the currency, and actually engages in the business of banking in this state.

Any person desiring to conditionally register a bank trade name for any proposed Wyoming state chartered bank shall comply with the provisions of this act. The secretary of state shall conditionally approve the proposed trade name if it is not the same as or deceptively similar to any trademark or service mark registered in this state, and is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from other business names as required by W.S.

17-16-401

. Conditional approval shall expire in twelve (12) months but may be extended for good cause for an additional six (6) months. The conditional approval shall terminate upon approval of the proposed charter by the Wyoming state banking commissioner and the Wyoming state banking board and the filing of the bank’s articles of incorporation with the secretary of state since at that time the name of the state chartered bank will be protected by W.S.

17-16-401

(b).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 230, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.16; Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2; 1985, ch. 193, § 1; 1990, ch. 7, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1996, ch. 80, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to banks, banking and finance, see title 13.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsections (b), (c) and (d), see § 40-2-101(a)(v).

§ 40-2-103.
Reservation.

Any person intending to adopt a trade name for use and intending to apply for registration of a trade name may reserve the trade name in the following manner. Reservation shall be made by filing an application with the secretary of state to reserve a specified trade name, executed by the applicant. If the secretary of state finds that the name is available for use, and upon payment of thirty dollars ($30.00), he shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days. The reservation is not renewable.

The right to the exclusive use of a specified trade name so reserved may be transferred to any other person by filing a notice of the transfer in the office of the secretary of state, executed by the applicant for whom the name was reserved and specifying the name and address of the transferee.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.17; Laws 1993, ch. 146, § 2.

§ 40-2-104.
Application for registration.

Subject to the limitations set forth in this act and upon payment of one hundred dollars ($100.00), any person who adopts a trade name for use in this state may file an application for registration of the trade name in duplicate in the office of the secretary of state on forms furnished by the secretary of state setting forth, but not limited to, the following information:

The name and business address of the applicant for registration, and if a corporation, the state of incorporation;

The trade name sought to be registered;

The general nature of the business in fact conducted by the applicant;

The signature of the applicant acknowledged before a notarial officer.

Upon compliance by the applicant with the requirements of this act, the secretary of state shall return a duplicate copy of the application for registration to the applicant stamped with the date of filing.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 230, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.17; Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 40-7.18; Laws 1993, ch. 146, § 2; 2008, ch. 20, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” in (a)(iv).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a) and in subsection (b), see § 40-2-101(a)(v).

§ 40-2-105.
Duration and renewal.

Registration of a trade name under this act is effective for ten (10) years. Within six (6) months prior to the expiration of a term, registration may be renewed for additional ten (10) year periods. A renewal fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall accompany an application for renewal of registration. The application for renewal shall include a statement that the trade name is still in use in this state. Notification of expiration and the forms for application for renewal shall be furnished to the registrant by the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall notify registrants of trade names of the necessity of renewal within the year next preceding the expiration of the ten (10) years from the date of registration or renewal by writing to the last known address of the registrants.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 230, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.18; Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 40-7.19; Laws 1993, ch. 146, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), see § 40-2-101(a)(v).

§ 40-2-106.
Assignment.

Any trade name registered under this act is assignable with the goodwill of the business in which the trade name is used. Assignment shall be by an instrument in writing duly executed and shall be recorded with the secretary of state upon payment of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). Upon recording the assignment, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate in the name of the assignee for the remainder of the term of the registration.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 230, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.19; Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 40-7.20; Laws 1993, ch. 146, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 40-2-101(a)(v).

§ 40-2-107.
Cancellation.

The secretary of state shall cancel from the registration record:

Any registration upon request for cancellation from the registrant or the assignee of record and upon payment of a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) to the secretary of state to be credited to the general fund;

Any registration granted under this act and not renewed in accordance with its provisions;

Any registration if a court of competent jurisdiction finds:

That the registered trade name has been abandoned;

That the registrant is not the owner of the trade name;

That the registration was granted improperly; or

That the registration was obtained fraudulently.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 230, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.21; Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2; 1993, ch. 146, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 40-2-101(a)(v).

§ 40-2-108.
Fraudulent registration.

Any person who procures the registration of any trade name in the office of the secretary of state under the provisions of this act, by knowingly making any false or fraudulent representation or declaration, verbally or in writing, or by any other fraudulent means, is liable for the payment of all damages sustained in consequence of the filing or registration and the costs of the action together with reasonable attorneys’ fees as determined by the court, to be recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction by any party injured.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 230, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.22; Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-2-101(a)(v).

§ 40-2-109.
Common-law rights.

This act shall not adversely affect rights in trade names, or the enforcement of rights in trade names, acquired at any time in good faith at common law.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 230, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 40-7.25; Laws 1977, ch. 162, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 40-7.23.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 40-2-101(a)(v).

Concepts with respect to trade names containing geographicand generic words. —

See Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Security Bank & Trust Co., 572 P.2d 1120,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1977).

Confusion caused by trade name must be such as to warrant issuance of injunction.

That is, potential customers must be confused or deceived into patronizing one bank in the mistaken belief that they are dealing with another bank. Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Security Bank & Trust Co., 572 P.2d 1120,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1977).

Burden of proving confusion. —

Unless a trade name is confusing and deceptive on its face, those seeking such protection must take the burden of proving that they have given to their trade names a secondary meaning through years of usage and if in this case defendant was to be allowed to use its new name, the public would be confused by its similarity to the trade names of plaintiffs. Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Security Bank & Trust Co., 572 P.2d 1120,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1977).

Proposed name held distinguishable from others. —

Where Security Bank & Trust Co., as a member of Wyoming Bancorporation, planned to change its name to “First Wyoming Bank-Casper,” as in the case of all other member banks in the state for conformity to a uniform standard, “First Wyoming Bank-(name of city in which located),” the proposed name was readily distinguishable from the names of plaintiffs, i.e., First National Bank of Casper and Wyoming National Bank of Casper, and was not likely to confuse, deceive or mislead. Wyoming Nat'l Bank v. Security Bank & Trust Co., 572 P.2d 1120,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 305

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 40-2-110.
Powers.

The secretary of state has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him by this chapter. The secretary of state shall promulgate reasonable forms, rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

2021 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 40-2-111.
Refusal to file documents.

If the secretary of state refuses to file a document submitted for filing under this act, the secretary of state shall return it to the filing party or representative within fifteen (15) days after the document was delivered, together with a brief, written explanation of the reason for the refusal.

History.

2021 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 21, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.